California, session 20252026, AB1465.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4750.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4750.5. In order to gather data that is relevant to ensuring the safety and well-being of persons with developmental disabilities, the department shall ensure that the client master file entry for any person with developmental disabilities who is placed by a regional center will be updated within 30 days after the change of residence.